Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-386.02
Unincorporated mutual associations; existing associations, continuance in operation; approval required.

No such association now existing shall continue to operate after June 30, 1964, unless it shall have met the requirements of section 44-386.01.

Laws 1963, c. 268, § 3, p. 802.